Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB642.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6331(3) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6331. Establishment of Statewide database.There shall be established in the department a Statewide database of protective services, which shall include the following, as provided by section 6336 (relating to information in Statewide database):* * *(3) Indicated and founded reports of child abuse[.], 12345678910111213141516171819202122 including the designated child protection tier level of the reports under section 6335(h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database).* * *Section 2. Section 6335(e) of Title 23 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 6335. Access to information in Statewide database.* * *(e) Certifications.--Information provided in response to inquiries under section 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents), 6344.1 (relating to information relating to certified or licensed child-care home residents) or 6344.2 (relating to volunteers having contact with children) shall be subject to the limitations under subsections (g) and (h) and shall not include unfounded reports of child abuse or reports related to general protective services [and]. Information provided under this section shall be limited to the following:(1) Whether the person was named as a perpetrator of child abuse in a founded or indicated report.(2) Whether there is an investigation pending in which the individual is an alleged perpetrator.(3) The number, date of the incidents upon which the report is based and the type of abuse or neglect involved in any reports identified under paragraph (1).(4) The clearance level of the certification, if applicable, and the position or purpose for which the certification was requested, under subsection (g).* * *(g) Clearance levels.--20250SB0642PN0649 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An individual requesting a certification under subsection (e) must indicate to the department the purpose for the certification request. If the certification request is for employment or volunteer purposes, the individual must indicate to the department the nature of the employment or volunteer position.(2) Upon receipt of a certification request, the department shall verify that the individual requesting the certification meets the definition of an individual required to submit a certification under section 6344(b).(3) If the individual requesting the certification does not meet the definition of an individual who is required to submit a certification under section 6344(b), the department shall provide the individual with a notice stating that the individual cannot be required to submit a certification as a condition of employment or volunteering pursuant to section 6344(b).(4) If the individual meets the definition of an individual who is required to submit a certification under section 6344(b), the department shall designate the clearance level required for the position for which the individual has applied, as provided in paragraph (5), except as described in paragraph (5)(iii). Information about founded or indicated reports provided by the department under subsection (e) shall be subject to the following limitations based on the clearance level and child protection tier as provided in subsection (h).(5) Clearance levels shall be as follows:(i) Clearance level 1 shall be required for an individual who applies to work or volunteer in a position 20250SB0642PN0649 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in which the individual is responsible for a child's welfare or for the care, supervision, guidance or control of children at a school, day care, health care facility that serves children or facility providing a program, activity or service for children, including a position as a children's healthcare provider, camp counselor, school employee, coach or other position providing child-care services, as defined in section 6303(a) (relating to definitions), except as provided under subparagraph (iii). A certification issued by the department under this subparagraph shall include information about founded and indicated reports subject to the following limitations:(A) An indicated or founded report classified as child protection tier I, as provided in subsection (h), shall be reportable under clearance level 1 indefinitely.(B) An indicated or founded report classified as child protection tier II, as provided in subsection (h), shall be reportable under clearance level 1 for a period of 10 years from the date of the incident.(C) An indicated or founded report classified as child protection tier III, as provided in subsection (h), shall be reportable under clearance level 1 for a period of three years from the date of the incident.(ii) Clearance level 2 shall be required for an individual who applies to work or volunteer in a position in which the individual is not responsible for a child's welfare or for the care, supervision, guidance or control 20250SB0642PN0649 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of children, but does have routine interaction with children, as defined under subsection 6303(a), due to working or volunteering at a health care facility that serves children, school, day care, a facility providing child-care services as defined under subsection 6303(a) or a facility providing a program, activity or service for children, including positions as administrative, cafeteria, janitorial or other non-direct-care staff who have regular and repeated contact with children integral to the individual's employment or volunteer responsibilities. A certification issued by the department under this subparagraph shall include information about founded and indicated reports subject to the following limitations:(A) An indicated or founded report classified as child protection tier I, as provided in subsection (h), shall be reportable under clearance level 2 for a period of 15 years from the date of the incident.(B) An indicated or founded report classified as child protection tier II, as provided in subsection (h), shall be reportable under clearance level 2 for a period of five years from the date of the incident.(C) An indicated or founded report classified as Child protection tier III, as provided in subsection (h), shall not be reportable under clearance level 2.(iii) If the certification request is for an individual who meets the description under section 6344(a)(2) or (3), or who otherwise meets the definition of a potential kinship care resource as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions) or a resource 20250SB0642PN0649 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family as defined in section 6303(a), the department may not designate a clearance level for the request. A certification issued by the department under this subparagraph shall not be subject to the limitations under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(6) Upon receipt of the certification provided under subsection (e), the individual requesting certification may, within 21 days, challenge the designated clearance level, including whether a certification may be required for the position to which the individual has applied under section 6344(b). In challenging the designated clearance level, the individual must provide the department with a brief explanation of why the individual disagrees with the designated clearance level.(h) Child protection tiers.--An indicated or founded report of abuse or neglect shall be categorized under a child protection tier level at the time the report is substantiated or, with regard to reports currently existing in the Statewide database prior to the effective date of this section, at the time a certification is requested under subsection (e), as follows:(1) Child protection tier I shall include the following reports of child abuse:(i) Causing bodily injury to a child through any recent act under section 6303(b.1)(1), if the injury rises to the level of serious bodily injury as defined under section 6303(a).(ii) Causing sexual abuse or exploitation of a child through an act under section 6303(b.1)(4).(iii) Causing serious physical neglect of a child 20250SB0642PN0649 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 6303(b.1)(7) if the neglect rises to the level of aggravated physical neglect as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302.(iv) Causing the death of a child through an act under section 6303(b.1)(9).(v) Engaging a child in a severe form of trafficking in persons or sex trafficking, as those terms are defined under section 103 of the Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (114 Stat. 1466, 22 U.S.C. § 7102), under section 6303(b.1)(10).(2) Child protection tier II shall include the following reports of child abuse:(i) Causing bodily injury to a child through a failure to act under section 6303(b.1)(1) if the injury rises to the level of serious bodily injury as defined under section 6303(a).(ii) Fabricating, feigning or intentionally exaggerating or inducing a medical symptom or disease resulting in a potentially harmful medical evaluation or treatment to the child through a recent act under section 6303(b.1)(2).(iii) Causing sexual abuse or exploitation of a child through a failure to act under section 6303(b.1)(4).(iv) Creating a likelihood of sexual abuse or exploitation of a child through a recent act or failure to act under section 6303(b.1)(6).(v) Engaging in any recent act described in section 6303(b.1)(8).(vi) Reports of child abuse designated as child 20250SB0642PN0649 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection tier III under paragraph (3) where the individual has two or more such reports within the five-year period immediately preceding the certification request.(3) Child protection tier III shall include the following reports of child abuse:(i) Causing bodily injury to a child through an act or failure to act under section 6303(b.1)(1) if the injury does not rise to the level of serious bodily injury as defined under section 6303(a).(ii) Creating a reasonable likelihood of bodily injury to a child through a recent act or failure to act under section 6303(b.1)(5).(iii) Causing serious physical neglect of a child under section 6303(b.1)(7) if the neglect does not rise to the level of aggravated physical neglect as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302.(iv) Causing or substantially contributing to serious mental injury to a child through an act or failure to act or a series of such acts or failures to act under section 6303(b.1)(3).Section 3. Sections 6336(a)(10), 6338(a), 6341(c.2)(5), 6344(b)(2), (c)(1) and (4)(iii) and (d)(1) and (2) introductory paragraph, 6344.1(b), 6344.3(e) and 6368(e) introductory paragraph, (f)(1) and (4) and (n)(3) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 6336. Information in Statewide database.(a) Information authorized.--The Statewide database shall include and shall be limited to the following information:* * *20250SB0642PN0649 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) If the report alleges child abuse, whether the report was determined to be founded, indicated or unfounded[.] and the child protection tier level for the report under section 6335(h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database).* * *§ 6338. Disposition of founded and indicated reports.(a) General rule.--When a report of suspected child abuse is determined by the appropriate county agency to be a founded report or an indicated report, the status of the report shall be changed from pending to founded or indicated and designated at the appropriate child protection tier level under section 6335(h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database) in the Statewide database. Notice of the determination that a report is a founded, indicated or unfounded report shall be made as provided in section 6368(f) (relating to investigation of reports).* * *§ 6341. Amendment or expunction of information.* * *(c.2) Hearing.--A person making an appeal under subsection (a)(2) or (c) shall have the right to a timely hearing to determine the merits of the appeal. A hearing shall be scheduled according to the following procedures:* * *(5) The department or county agency shall bear the burden of proving by substantial evidence that the report should remain categorized as an indicated report at the designated child protection tier level under section 6335(h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database).20250SB0642PN0649 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *§ 6344. Employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents.* * *(b) Information to be submitted.--An individual identified in subsection (a)(7) or (8) at the time the individual meets the description set forth in subsection (a)(7) or (8) and an individual identified in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5)(i) or (6), (a.1), (a.2) or (a.3) prior to the commencement of employment or service or in accordance with section 6344.4 shall be required to submit the following information to an employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or involved in the selection of volunteers:* * *(2) A certification from the department as to whether the applicant is named in the Statewide database as the alleged perpetrator in a pending child abuse investigation or as the perpetrator of a founded report or an indicated report[.] at the clearance level required for the position to which the applicant has applied pursuant to the procedures provided under section 6335(e), (f), (g) and (h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database). An applicant may not be asked to submit a certification under this subsection if the individual does not meet the definition of an individual identified in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5)(i), (6), (7) or (8), (a.1), (a.2) or (a.3). An applicant may not be required to obtain, as a condition of employment or volunteering under this subsection, a certification for a clearance level that exceeds the required clearance level for the position as provided under section 6335(g).20250SB0642PN0649 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c) Grounds for denying employment or participation in program, activity or service.--(1) In no case shall an employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or involved in the selection of volunteers hire or approve an applicant where the department has verified that the applicant is named in the Statewide database as the perpetrator of a founded report committed within the five-year period immediately preceding verification pursuant to this section. However, an indicated report shall not constitute a bar to employment or participation in a program, activity or service, except as provided under paragraph (4)(iii).* * *(4) In addition to paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), in no case shall an employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or involved in the selection of volunteers at a child day-care center, group day-care home or family child-care home hire or approve an applicant under any of the following circumstances:* * *(iii) The applicant's name appears on a Statewide database or its equivalent as a perpetrator of child abuse at the clearance level required for the position for which the applicant has applied under the procedures in section 6335(e), (f), (g) and (h).* * *(d) Prospective adoptive or foster parents.--With regard to prospective adoptive or prospective foster parents, the 20250SB0642PN0649 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following shall apply:(1) In the course of causing an investigation to be made pursuant to section 2535(a) (relating to investigation), an agency or person designated by the court to conduct the investigation shall require prospective adoptive parents and any individual over the age of 18 years residing in the home to submit the information set forth in subsection (b) for review in accordance with this section. If a prospective adoptive parent, or any individual over 18 years of age residing in the home, has resided outside this Commonwealth at any time within the previous five-year period, the agency or person designated by the court shall require that person to submit a certification obtained within the previous one-year period from the Statewide central registry, or its equivalent in each state in which the person has resided within the previous five-year period, as to whether the person is named as a perpetrator of child abuse. If the certification shows that the person is named as a perpetrator of child abuse within the previous five-year period, the agency or person designated by the court shall forward the certification to the department for review. The agency or person designated by the court shall not approve the prospective adoptive parent if the department determines that the person is named as the equivalent of a perpetrator of a founded report of child abuse within the previous five-year period. However, an indicated report shall not constitute a bar to approval as an adoptive parent under this section.(2) In the course of approving a prospective foster parent, a foster family care agency shall require prospective foster parents and any individual over the age of 18 years 20250SB0642PN0649 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residing in the home to submit the information set forth in subsection (b) for review by the foster family care agency in accordance with this section. If a prospective foster parent, or any individual over 18 years of age residing in the home, has resided outside this Commonwealth at any time within the previous five-year period, the foster family care agency shall require that person to submit a certification obtained within the previous one-year period from the Statewide central registry, or its equivalent in each state in which the person has resided within the previous five-year period, as to whether the person is named as a perpetrator of child abuse. If the certification shows that the person is named as a perpetrator of child abuse within the previous five-year period, the foster family care agency shall forward the certification to the department for review. The foster family care agency shall not approve the prospective foster parent if the department determines that the person is named as the equivalent of a perpetrator of a founded report of child abuse within the previous five-year period. However, an indicated report shall not constitute a bar to approval as a foster parent under this section. In addition, the foster family care agency shall consider the following when assessing the ability of applicants for approval as foster parents:* * *§ 6344.1. Information relating to certified or licensed child-care home residents.* * *(b) Required information.--Child abuse record information required under subsection (a) shall include certification by the 20250SB0642PN0649 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department as to whether the applicant is named in the Statewide database as the perpetrator of a founded report or an indicated report[.] at clearance level 1 under the procedures in section 6335(e), (f), (g) and (h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database). An applicant shall not be required to obtain a certification under this subsection for a clearance level that exceeds the required clearance level for the position as provided in section 6335(g).* * *§ 6344.3. Continued employment or participation in program, activity or service.* * *(e) Noninterference with decisions.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to otherwise interfere with the ability of an employer or person responsible for a program, activity or service to make employment, discipline or termination decisions or from establishing additional standards as part of the hiring or selection process for employees or volunteers[.], provided that employees or volunteers shall not be required to provide a certification for a clearance level that exceeds the requirements of the position for which they have applied, as provided in section 6335(g) (relating to access to information in Statewide database).* * *§ 6368. Investigation of reports.* * *(e) Review of indicated reports.--A final determination that a report of suspected child abuse is indicated, and the child protection tier level determination under section 6335(h) (relating to access to information in Statewide database), shall 20250SB0642PN0649 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be approved by:* * *(f) Final determination.--Immediately upon conclusion of the child abuse investigation, the county agency shall provide the results of its investigation to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. Within three business days of receipt of the results of the investigation from the county agency, the department shall send notice of the final determination to the subjects of the report, other than the abused child. The determination shall include the following information:(1) The status of the report, including the child protection tier level of the report under section 6335(h).* * *(4) The effect of the report upon future employment opportunities involving children, including an explanation of the effects of the clearance level and child protection tiers as provided in section 6335(g) and (h).* * *(n) Completion of investigation.--Investigations shall be completed in accordance with the following:* * *(3) Where a petition has been filed under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters) alleging that a child is a dependent child, the county agency shall make all reasonable efforts to complete the investigation to enable the hearing on the petition to be held as required by 42 Pa.C.S. § 6335 [(relating to release or holding of hearing)].Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0642PN0649 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829